District of Columbia statutes.
47-1807.56

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-202, § 2(c), 57 DCR 4746
Economic development zones, eligibility for tax incentives, see § 6-1504.
This section is referenced in § 47-1808.09.